src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX A Y 1076
SFX A 0 ли/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 дек/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 дай/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 симон/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 сифат/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 ча [^ь]
SFX A ь ча ь
SFX A 0 роқ/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 гача/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 -ю [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX A 0 -я [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX A 0 ёқ [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX A 0 у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX A 0 -а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX A 0 дагина .
SFX A 0 дангина .
SFX A 0 нигина .
SFX A 0 ларгина .
SFX A 0 лардагина .
SFX A 0 лардангина .
SFX A 0 ларнигина .
SFX A 0 гина [^кқ]
SFX A 0 кина [к]
SFX A 0 лару .
SFX A 0 лар-а .
SFX A 0 ларин .
SFX A 0 лиги .
SFX A 0 лигими .
SFX A 0 лиги-да .
SFX A 0 лиги-ку .
SFX A 0 лиги-чи .
SFX A 0 лигидир .
SFX A 0 лигидан .
SFX A 0 лигиданми .
SFX A 0 лигидан-да .
SFX A 0 лигидан-ку .
SFX A 0 лигидан-чи .
SFX A 0 лигидандир .
SFX A 0 лигига .
SFX A 0 лигигами .
SFX A 0 лигига-да .
SFX A 0 лигига-ку .
SFX A 0 лигига-чи .
SFX A 0 лигигадир .
SFX A 0 лигида .
SFX A 0 лигидами .
SFX A 0 лигида-да .
SFX A 0 лигида-ку .
SFX A 0 лигида-чи .
SFX A 0 лигидадир .
SFX A 0 лигини .
SFX A 0 лигиними .
SFX A 0 лигини-да .
SFX A 0 лигини-ку .
SFX A 0 лигини-чи .
SFX A 0 лигинидир .
SFX A 0 лигим .
SFX A 0 лигимми .
SFX A 0 лигим-да .
SFX A 0 лигим-ку .
SFX A 0 лигим-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимдир .
SFX A 0 лигимдан .
SFX A 0 лигимданми .
SFX A 0 лигимдан-да .
SFX A 0 лигимдан-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимдан-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимдандир .
SFX A 0 лигимга .
SFX A 0 лигимгами .
SFX A 0 лигимга-да .
SFX A 0 лигимга-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимга-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимгадир .
SFX A 0 лигимда .
SFX A 0 лигимдами .
SFX A 0 лигимда-да .
SFX A 0 лигимда-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимда-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимдадир .
SFX A 0 лигимни .
SFX A 0 лигимними .
SFX A 0 лигимни-да .
SFX A 0 лигимни-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимни-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимнидир .
SFX A 0 лигинг .
SFX A 0 лигингми .
SFX A 0 лигинг-да .
SFX A 0 лигинг-ку .
SFX A 0 лигинг-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингдир .
SFX A 0 лигингдан .
SFX A 0 лигингданми .
SFX A 0 лигингдан-да .
SFX A 0 лигингдан-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингдан-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингдандир .
SFX A 0 лигингга .
SFX A 0 лигинггами .
SFX A 0 лигингга-да .
SFX A 0 лигингга-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингга-чи .
SFX A 0 лигинггадир .
SFX A 0 лигингда .
SFX A 0 лигингдами .
SFX A 0 лигингда-да .
SFX A 0 лигингда-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингда-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингдадир .
SFX A 0 лигингни .
SFX A 0 лигингними .
SFX A 0 лигингни-да .
SFX A 0 лигингни-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингни-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингнидир .
SFX A 0 лигимиз .
SFX A 0 лигимизми .
SFX A 0 лигимиз-да .
SFX A 0 лигимиз-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимиз-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимиздир .
SFX A 0 лигимиздан .
SFX A 0 лигимизданми .
SFX A 0 лигимиздан-да .
SFX A 0 лигимиздан-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимиздан-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимиздандир .
SFX A 0 лигимизга .
SFX A 0 лигимизгами .
SFX A 0 лигимизга-да .
SFX A 0 лигимизга-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимизга-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимизгадир .
SFX A 0 лигимизда .
SFX A 0 лигимиздами .
SFX A 0 лигимизда-да .
SFX A 0 лигимизда-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимизда-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимиздадир .
SFX A 0 лигимизни .
SFX A 0 лигимизними .
SFX A 0 лигимизни-да .
SFX A 0 лигимизни-ку .
SFX A 0 лигимизни-чи .
SFX A 0 лигимизнидир .
SFX A 0 лигингиз .
SFX A 0 лигингизми .
SFX A 0 лигингиз-да .
SFX A 0 лигингиз-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингиз-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингиздир .
SFX A 0 лигингиздан .
SFX A 0 лигингизданми .
SFX A 0 лигингиздан-да .
SFX A 0 лигингиздан-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингиздан-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингиздандир .
SFX A 0 лигингизга .
SFX A 0 лигингизгами .
SFX A 0 лигингизга-да .
SFX A 0 лигингизга-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингизга-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингизгадир .
SFX A 0 лигингизда .
SFX A 0 лигингиздами .
SFX A 0 лигингизда-да .
SFX A 0 лигингизда-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингизда-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингиздадир .
SFX A 0 лигингизни .
SFX A 0 лигингизними .
SFX A 0 лигингизни-да .
SFX A 0 лигингизни-ку .
SFX A 0 лигингизни-чи .
SFX A 0 лигингизнидир .
SFX A 0 симонлиги .
SFX A 0 симонлигими .
SFX A 0 симонлиги-да .
SFX A 0 симонлиги-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлиги-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигидир .
SFX A 0 симонлигидан .
SFX A 0 симонлигиданми .
SFX A 0 симонлигидан-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигидан-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигидан-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигидандир .
SFX A 0 симонлигига .
SFX A 0 симонлигигами .
SFX A 0 симонлигига-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигига-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигига-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигигадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигида .
SFX A 0 симонлигидами .
SFX A 0 симонлигида-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигида-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигида-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигидадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигини .
SFX A 0 симонлигиними .
SFX A 0 симонлигини-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигини-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигини-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигинидир .
SFX A 0 симонлигим .
SFX A 0 симонлигимми .
SFX A 0 симонлигим-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигим-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигим-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимдир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимдан .
SFX A 0 симонлигимданми .
SFX A 0 симонлигимдан-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимдан-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимдан-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимдандир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимга .
SFX A 0 симонлигимгами .
SFX A 0 симонлигимга-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимга-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимга-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимгадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимда .
SFX A 0 симонлигимдами .
SFX A 0 симонлигимда-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимда-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимда-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимдадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимни .
SFX A 0 симонлигимними .
SFX A 0 симонлигимни-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимни-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимни-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимнидир .
SFX A 0 симонлигинг .
SFX A 0 симонлигингми .
SFX A 0 симонлигинг-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигинг-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигинг-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингдир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингдан .
SFX A 0 симонлигингданми .
SFX A 0 симонлигингдан-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингдан-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингдан-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингдандир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингга .
SFX A 0 симонлигинггами .
SFX A 0 симонлигингга-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингга-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингга-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигинггадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингда .
SFX A 0 симонлигингдами .
SFX A 0 симонлигингда-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингда-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингда-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингдадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингни .
SFX A 0 симонлигингними .
SFX A 0 симонлигингни-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингни-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингни-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингнидир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиз .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизми .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиз-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиз-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиз-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиздир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиздан .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизданми .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиздан-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиздан-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиздан-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиздандир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизга .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизгами .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизга-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизга-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизга-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизгадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизда .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиздами .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизда-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизда-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизда-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимиздадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизни .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизними .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизни-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизни-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизни-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигимизнидир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиз .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизми .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиз-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиз-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиз-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиздир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиздан .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизданми .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиздан-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиздан-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиздан-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиздандир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизга .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизгами .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизга-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизга-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизга-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизгадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизда .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиздами .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизда-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизда-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизда-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингиздадир .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизни .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизними .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизни-да .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизни-ку .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизни-чи .
SFX A 0 симонлигингизнидир .
SFX A 0 чалиги .
SFX A 0 чалигими .
SFX A 0 чалиги-да .
SFX A 0 чалиги-ку .
SFX A 0 чалиги-чи .
SFX A 0 чалигидир .
SFX A 0 чалигидан .
SFX A 0 чалигиданми .
SFX A 0 чалигидан-да .
SFX A 0 чалигидан-ку .
SFX A 0 чалигидан-чи .
SFX A 0 чалигидандир .
SFX A 0 чалигига .
SFX A 0 чалигигами .
SFX A 0 чалигига-да .
SFX A 0 чалигига-ку .
SFX A 0 чалигига-чи .
SFX A 0 чалигигадир .
