src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
Абдусатторова/ACVIJKLMQS
авиагоризонт/ABVIJKLMQS
автомагистраль/ABVIJKLMQS
агитпункт/ABVIJKLMQS
адигей/ABVIJKLMQS
аза/ACVIJKLMQS
айланганлик/AEVIJKLMQS
аккредитивлар/ABVIJKLMQS
ақча/ACVIJKLMQS
алкинлар/ABVIJKLMQS
альдрин/ABVIJKLMQS
анастигмат/ABVIJKLMQS
аноррангли/AEVIJKLMQS
аргентум/ABVIJKLMQS
арслонча/ACVIJKLMQS
асовлик/AEVIJKLMQS
атомистик/AEVIJKLMQS
аҳмоқчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
бавосир/ABVIJKLMQS
байир/ABVIJKLMQS
банан/ABVIJKLMQS
басит/ABVIJKLMQS
беамал/ABVIJKLMQS
безрайтирув/ABVIJKLMQS
бемустасно/AFVIJKLMQS
бетинчлик/AEVIJKLMQS
биғирлов/ABVIJKLMQS
биоиндикатор/ABVIJKLMQS
бичирув/ABVIJKLMQS
бойпараст/ABVIJKLMQS
бости-бости/ACVIJKLMQS
бувайдалик/AEVIJKLMQS
буйрак/AEVIJKLMQS
бульдонеж/ABVIJKLMQS
бутлаш/ABVIJKLMQS
вакуумметр/ABVIJKLMQS
вафосизлик/AEVIJKLMQS
виз-виз/ABVIJKLMQS
вульгарчи/ACVIJKLMQS
гапхўрлик/AEVIJKLMQS
геосфера/ACVIJKLMQS
гиламчи/ACVIJKLMQS
гранка/ACVIJKLMQS
гуманистлик/AEVIJKLMQS
ғалласимон/ABVIJKLMQS
давомлаш/ABVIJKLMQS
даранг/ABVIJKLMQS
даҳан/ABVIJKLMQS
декламаторлик/AEVIJKLMQS
диагоналли/ACVIJKLMQS
димлатиш/ABVIJKLMQS
доғи/ACVIJKLMQS
дуалист/ABVIJKLMQS
дўрилдоқ/ADVIJKLMQS
ёзин-қишин/ABVIJKLMQS
емас/ABVIJKLMQS
ер-осмон/ABVIJKLMQS
жадал-жудал/ABVIJKLMQS
жаҳлланув/ABVIJKLMQS
жиринг-жиринг/ABVIJKLMQS
жўнашув/ABVIJKLMQS
занжирбанд/ABVIJKLMQS
зидланиш/ABVIJKLMQS
зорли/ACVIJKLMQS
идиш-оёқ/ADVIJKLMQS
икков-икков/ABVIJKLMQS
илҳомлантирувчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
инкор/ABVIJKLMQS
ипакхона/ACVIJKLMQS
истарасиз/ABVIJKLMQS
ичиқоралик/AEVIJKLMQS
йиға-соча/ACVIJKLMQS
йўргаклаш/ABVIJKLMQS
каллақанд/ABVIJKLMQS
камчил/ABVIJKLMQS
карта/ACVIJKLMQS
квадриллион/ABVIJKLMQS
кенагас/ABVIJKLMQS
кечинма/ACVIJKLMQS
киноявий/ABVIJKLMQS
клубдош/ABVIJKLMQS
комплекс/ABVIJKLMQS
кооперативлашиц/ABVIJKLMQS
кристаллография/ACVIJKLMQS
кулдиргич/ABVIJKLMQS
кўп-оз/ABVIJKLMQS
кучайтирма/ACVIJKLMQS
қалтислик/AEVIJKLMQS
қизғанчиқлик/AEVIJKLMQS
қози/ACVIJKLMQS
қув/ABVIJKLMQS
қуритгич/ABVIJKLMQS
лазурит/ABVIJKLMQS
либретто/AFVIJKLMQS
лотерея/ACVIJKLMQS
маданиятсизлик/AEVIJKLMQS
маккаисано/AFVIJKLMQS
мансабсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
масхаралаш/ABVIJKLMQS
Машҳад/ABVIJKLMQS
меросхўрлик/AEVIJKLMQS
микрокредит/ABVIJKLMQS
мирзалик/AEVIJKLMQS
мол-жон/ABVIJKLMQS
муболағачи/ACVIJKLMQS
мўл-мўл/ABVIJKLMQS
мусобақадош/ABVIJKLMQS
муюлиш/ABVIJKLMQS
найчакашлик/AEVIJKLMQS
наслсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
неонлампа/ACVIJKLMQS
Ницца/ACVIJKLMQS
номерсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
ноҳия/ACVIJKLMQS
обрўли/AHVIJKLMQS
Одилович/ABVIJKLMQS
окуляр/ABVIJKLMQS
олис-яқиндаги/ACVIJKLMQS
онтар-тўнтар/ABVIJKLMQS
ортма/ACVIJKLMQS
охирзамонда/ACVIJKLMQS
пайпоқли/ACVIJKLMQS
Парда/ACVIJKLMQST
патрология/ACVIJKLMQS
пиёниста/ACVIJKLMQS
планлаштирув/ABVIJKLMQS
поллатиш/ABVIJKLMQS
провокатор/ABVIJKLMQS
пўчоқсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
рақамсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
реверсия/ACVIJKLMQS
рефлекс/ABVIJKLMQS
рўдаполик/AEVIJKLMQS
савоб/ABVIJKLMQS
саллақовоқ/ADVIJKLMQS
сараловчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
сафоли/ACVIJKLMQS
семурғ/ABVIJKLMQS
серхашак/AEVIJKLMQS
симобсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
сифатлаш/ABVIJKLMQS
созчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
союз/ABVIJKLMQS
субутсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
суқтирув/ABVIJKLMQS
сурп/ABVIJKLMQS
табиий-қонуний/ABVIJKLMQS
тақалатиш/ABVIJKLMQS
тангенс/ABVIJKLMQS
таркиб/ABVIJKLMQS
ташвишли/AHVIJKLMQS
текинга/ACVIJKLMQS
теплоизоляция/ACVIJKLMQS
тикилгансимон/ABVIJKLMQS
тираклов/ABVIJKLMQS
тоғ-ўтлоқ/ADVIJKLMQS
топиша/ACVIJKLMQS
трапециясимон/ABVIJKLMQS
тўзиқлик/AEVIJKLMQS
тўлин-тўкин/ABVIJKLMQS
турғунлик/AEVIJKLMQS
тутунлагич/ABVIJKLMQS
удли/ACVIJKLMQS
уйғотувчи/ACVIJKLMQS
ўладиган/ABVIJKLMQS
универсалчи/ACVIJKLMQS
ўроқсимон/ABVIJKLMQS
Ўткирова/ACVIJKLMQS
ушшоқ/ADVIJKLMQS
фарзандлик/AEVIJKLMQS
фикрий/ABVIJKLMQS
форточкали/ACVIJKLMQS
хаёлпараст/ABVIJKLMQS
хиёнатчи/ACVIJKLMQS
холос/ABVIJKLMQS
хўжалик/AEVIJKLMQS
хуштамлик/AEVIJKLMQS
ҳақиқат/ABVIJKLMQS
ҳаяжон/ABVIJKLMQS
ҳужжатлаштириш/ABVIJKLMQS
цехма-цех/ABVIJKLMQS
чалиш/ABVIJKLMQS
чегалатиш/ABVIJKLMQS
чиқара/ACVIJKLMQS
чирчиқлик/AEVIJKLMQS
чувашиш/ABVIJKLMQS
чўталсиз/ABVIJKLMQS
шамоллов/ABVIJKLMQS
шевачи/ACVIJKLMQS
шиорнавислик/AEVIJKLMQS
Шодия/ACVIJKLMQSU
штурвалчи/ACVIJKLMQS
Элдор/ABVIJKLMQST
эртакчилик/AEVIJKLMQS
юмор/ABVIJKLMQS
яроғхона/ACVIJKLMQS
